Utah statutes.
48-2c-1703.   Pleading.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall set forth with particularity the effort of the plaintiff to secure the initiation of the action by the managers or members or the reasons for not making the effort.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

